District of Columbia statutes.
34-210

“Gas plant” defined.

The term “gas plant” when used in this subtitle means the material, equipment, and property owned and used, or to be used, by the gas company for or in connection with the transmission or distribution of natural gas in the District of Columbia to a retail natural gas customer.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 975, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 17(a)(4), 51 DCR 10549

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1311.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-212.
1973 Ed., § 43-112.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-227 rewrote the section which had read:
“The term ‘gas plant’ when used in this subtitle includes all buildings, easements, real estate, mains, pipes, conduits, service pipes, services, pipe galleries, meters, boilers, water-gas sets, retorts, fixtures, condensers, scrubbers, purifiers, holders, materials, apparatus, personal property, and franchises, and property of every kind used in the conduct of the business operated, owned, controlled, used or to be used for or in connection with or to facilitate the manufacture, distribution, sale, or furnishing of gas (natural or manufactured) for light, heat, or power.”